Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.127

Agreements with other states for certain examination costs.

(1) As used in this section, "other state" and "another state" includes the several states, territories, and possessions of the United States, and the District of Columbia.

(2)(a) The director shall attempt to enter into an agreement with any other state for reimbursement to the crime victims' compensation fund if a nonresident of the state of Washington who is a victim of a sexual assault or domestic violence assault involving nonfatal strangulation that occurred in another state receives an examination in this state pursuant to RCW 7.68.170 or 7.68.803.

(b) For other states with which the department has an agreement for reimbursement as provided in (a) of this subsection, the department shall promptly make a report to the other state showing any costs incurred by a hospital or other emergency medical facility paid by this state pursuant to (a) of this subsection. The department shall ensure that no information related to the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 is provided to any state whose law is against the public policy of the state of Washington as provided in RCW 7.115.020.

(3) The director is hereby authorized to receive reimbursements to the crime victims' compensation fund from another state pursuant to this section.

[ 2024 c 297 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 297: "This act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2024 c 297 s 20.]